Illinois, session 104th, SB3892.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 5.790 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.790)7    Sec. 5.790. The Death Penalty Restoration Abolition Fund.8(Source: P.A. 96-1543, eff. 7-1-11; 97-813, eff. 7-13-12.) 9    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 10changing Sections 9-1, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, and 1111-1.60 as follows: 12    (720 ILCS 5/9-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 9-1)13    Sec. 9-1. First degree murder. 14    (a) A person who kills an individual without lawful 15justification commits first degree murder if, in performing 16the acts which cause the death: 17        (1) he or she either intends to kill or do great bodily 18    harm to that individual or another, or knows that such 19    acts will cause death to that individual or another; or 20        (2) he or she knows that such acts create a strong 21    probability of death or great bodily harm to that   SB3892- 2 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    individual or another; or 2        (3) he or she, acting alone or with one or more 3    participants, commits or attempts to commit a forcible 4    felony other than second degree murder, and in the course 5    of or in furtherance of such crime or flight therefrom, he 6    or she or another participant causes the death of a 7    person. 8    (a-5) Sentence. A person convicted of first degree murder 9may be sentenced to death. If a person convicted of first 10degree murder is not sentenced to death, the person may be 11sentenced to a term of imprisonment as provided in Chapter V of 12the Unified Code of Corrections. 13    (b) (Blank). 14    (b-5) (Blank). 15    (c) (Blank). 16    (d) (Blank). 17    (e) (Blank). 18    (f) (Blank). 19    (g) (Blank). 20    (h) (Blank). 21    (h-5) (Blank). 22    (i) (Blank). 23    (j) (Blank). 24    (k) (Blank). 25(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   SB3892- 3 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    (720 ILCS 5/11-1.20)   (was 720 ILCS 5/12-13)2    Sec. 11-1.20. Criminal sexual assault. 3    (a) A person commits criminal sexual assault if that 4person commits an act of sexual penetration and:5        (1) uses force or threat of force;6        (2) knows that the victim is unable to understand the 7    nature of the act or is unable to give knowing consent;8        (3) is a family member of the victim, and the victim is 9    under 18 years of age; or10        (4) is 17 years of age or over and holds a position of 11    trust, authority, or supervision in relation to the 12    victim, and the victim is at least 13 years of age but 13    under 18 years of age.14    (b) Sentence. 15        (1) Criminal sexual assault is a Class 1 felony for 16    which the person may be sentenced to death. If not 17    sentenced to death, the person shall be sentenced to a 18    term of imprisonment for a Class 1 felony, except that: 19            (A) A person who is convicted of the offense of 20        criminal sexual assault as defined in paragraph (a)(1) 21        or (a)(2) after having previously been convicted of 22        the offense of criminal sexual assault or the offense 23        of exploitation of a child, or who is convicted of the 24        offense of criminal sexual assault as defined in 25        paragraph (a)(1) or (a)(2) after having previously 26        been convicted under the laws of this State or any   SB3892- 4 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1        other state of an offense that is substantially 2        equivalent to the offense of criminal sexual assault 3        or to the offense of exploitation of a child, commits a 4        Class X felony for which the person shall be sentenced 5        to a term of imprisonment of not less than 30 years and 6        not more than 60 years, except that if the person is 7        under the age of 18 years at the time of the offense, 8        he or she shall be sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 9        of the Unified Code of Corrections. The commission of 10        the second or subsequent offense is required to have 11        been after the initial conviction for this paragraph 12        (A) to apply.13            (B) A person who has attained the age of 18 years 14        at the time of the commission of the offense and who is 15        convicted of the offense of criminal sexual assault as 16        defined in paragraph (a)(1) or (a)(2) after having 17        previously been convicted of the offense of aggravated 18        criminal sexual assault or the offense of predatory 19        criminal sexual assault of a child, or who is 20        convicted of the offense of criminal sexual assault as 21        defined in paragraph (a)(1) or (a)(2) after having 22        previously been convicted under the laws of this State 23        or any other state of an offense that is substantially 24        equivalent to the offense of aggravated criminal 25        sexual assault or the offense of predatory criminal 26        sexual assault of a child shall be sentenced to a term   SB3892- 5 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1        of natural life imprisonment. The commission of the 2        second or subsequent offense is required to have been 3        after the initial conviction for this paragraph (B) to 4        apply. An offender under the age of 18 years at the 5        time of the commission of the offense covered by this 6        subparagraph (B) shall be sentenced under Section 7        5-4.5-105 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 8            (C) A second or subsequent conviction for a 9        violation of paragraph (a)(3) or (a)(4) or under any 10        similar statute of this State or any other state for 11        any offense involving criminal sexual assault that is 12        substantially equivalent to or more serious than the 13        sexual assault prohibited under paragraph (a)(3) or 14        (a)(4) is a Class X felony. 15(Source: P.A. 99-69, eff. 1-1-16.) 16    (720 ILCS 5/11-1.30)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-14)17    Sec. 11-1.30. Aggravated Criminal Sexual Assault. 18    (a) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual assault if 19that person commits criminal sexual assault and any of the 20following aggravating circumstances exist during the 21commission of the offense or, for purposes of paragraph (7), 22occur as part of the same course of conduct as the commission 23of the offense:24        (1) the person displays, threatens to use, or uses a 25    dangerous weapon, other than a firearm, or any other   SB3892- 6 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    object fashioned or used in a manner that leads the 2    victim, under the circumstances, reasonably to believe 3    that the object is a dangerous weapon;4        (2) the person causes bodily harm to the victim, 5    except as provided in paragraph (10);6        (3) the person acts in a manner that threatens or 7    endangers the life of the victim or any other person;8        (4) the person commits the criminal sexual assault 9    during the course of committing or attempting to commit 10    any other felony;11        (5) the victim is 60 years of age or older;12        (6) the victim is a person with a physical disability;13        (7) the person delivers (by injection, inhalation, 14    ingestion, transfer of possession, or any other means) any 15    controlled substance to the victim without the victim's 16    consent or by threat or deception for other than medical 17    purposes;18        (8) the person is armed with a firearm;19        (9) the person personally discharges a firearm during 20    the commission of the offense; or21        (10) the person personally discharges a firearm during 22    the commission of the offense, and that discharge 23    proximately causes great bodily harm, permanent 24    disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to another 25    person.26    (b) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual assault if   SB3892- 7 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1that person is under 17 years of age and: (i) commits an act of 2sexual penetration with a victim who is under 9 years of age; 3or (ii) commits an act of sexual penetration with a victim who 4is at least 9 years of age but under 13 years of age and the 5person uses force or threat of force to commit the act.6    (c) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual assault if 7that person commits an act of sexual penetration with a victim 8who is a person with a severe or profound intellectual 9disability.10    (d) Sentence.11        (0.05) A person convicted of aggravated criminal 12    sexual assault may be sentenced to death. If a person 13    convicted of aggravated criminal sexual assault is not 14    sentenced to death, the person shall be sentenced as 15    provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection. 16        (1) Aggravated criminal sexual assault in violation of 17    paragraph (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), or (7) of subsection 18    (a) or in violation of subsection (b) or (c) is a Class X 19    felony. A violation of subsection (a)(1) is a Class X 20    felony for which 10 years shall be added to the term of 21    imprisonment imposed by the court. A violation of 22    subsection (a)(8) is a Class X felony for which 15 years 23    shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 24    court. A violation of subsection (a)(9) is a Class X 25    felony for which 20 years shall be added to the term of 26    imprisonment imposed by the court. A violation of   SB3892- 8 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    subsection (a)(10) is a Class X felony for which 25 years 2    or up to a term of natural life imprisonment shall be added 3    to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court. An 4    offender under the age of 18 years at the time of the 5    commission of aggravated criminal sexual assault in 6    violation of paragraphs (1) through (10) of subsection (a) 7    shall be sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 of the Unified 8    Code of Corrections. 9        (2) A person who has attained the age of 18 years at 10    the time of the commission of the offense and who is 11    convicted of a second or subsequent offense of aggravated 12    criminal sexual assault, or who is convicted of the 13    offense of aggravated criminal sexual assault after having 14    previously been convicted of the offense of criminal 15    sexual assault or the offense of predatory criminal sexual 16    assault of a child, or who is convicted of the offense of 17    aggravated criminal sexual assault after having previously 18    been convicted under the laws of this or any other state of 19    an offense that is substantially equivalent to the offense 20    of criminal sexual assault, the offense of aggravated 21    criminal sexual assault or the offense of predatory 22    criminal sexual assault of a child, shall be sentenced to 23    a term of natural life imprisonment. The commission of the 24    second or subsequent offense is required to have been 25    after the initial conviction for this paragraph (2) to 26    apply. An offender under the age of 18 years at the time of   SB3892- 9 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    the commission of the offense covered by this paragraph 2    (2) shall be sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 of the 3    Unified Code of Corrections. 4(Source: P.A. 99-69, eff. 1-1-16; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 599-642, eff. 7-28-16.) 6    (720 ILCS 5/11-1.40)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-14.1)7    Sec. 11-1.40. Predatory criminal sexual assault of a 8child. 9    (a) A person commits predatory criminal sexual assault of 10a child if that person is 17 years of age or older, and commits 11an act of contact, however slight, between the sex organ or 12anus of one person and the part of the body of another for the 13purpose of sexual gratification or arousal of the victim or 14the accused, or an act of sexual penetration, and:15        (1) the victim is under 13 years of age; or16        (2) the victim is under 13 years of age and that 17    person:18            (A) is armed with a firearm;19            (B) personally discharges a firearm during the 20        commission of the offense;21            (C) causes great bodily harm to the victim that:22                (i) results in permanent disability; or23                (ii) is life threatening; or24            (D) delivers (by injection, inhalation, ingestion, 25        transfer of possession, or any other means) any   SB3892- 10 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1        controlled substance to the victim without the 2        victim's consent or by threat or deception, for other 3        than medical purposes.4    (b) Sentence.5        (0.05) A person convicted of predatory criminal sexual 6    assault of a child may be sentenced to death. If a person 7    convicted of predatory criminal sexual assault of a child 8    is not sentenced to death, the person shall be sentenced 9    as provided in paragraphs (1), (1.1), (1.2), and (2) of 10    this subsection.11        (1) A person convicted of a violation of subsection 12    (a)(1) commits a Class X felony, for which the person 13    shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less 14    than 6 years and not more than 60 years. A person convicted 15    of a violation of subsection (a)(2)(A) commits a Class X 16    felony for which 15 years shall be added to the term of 17    imprisonment imposed by the court. A person convicted of a 18    violation of subsection (a)(2)(B) commits a Class X felony 19    for which 20 years shall be added to the term of 20    imprisonment imposed by the court. A person who has 21    attained the age of 18 years at the time of the commission 22    of the offense and who is convicted of a violation of 23    subsection (a)(2)(C) commits a Class X felony for which 24    the person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of 25    not less than 50 years or up to a term of natural life 26    imprisonment. An offender under the age of 18 years at the   SB3892- 11 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    time of the commission of predatory criminal sexual 2    assault of a child in violation of subsections (a)(1), 3    (a)(2)(A), (a)(2)(B), and (a)(2)(C) shall be sentenced 4    under Section 5-4.5-105 of the Unified Code of 5    Corrections. 6        (1.1) A person convicted of a violation of subsection 7    (a)(2)(D) commits a Class X felony for which the person 8    shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less 9    than 50 years and not more than 60 years. An offender under 10    the age of 18 years at the time of the commission of 11    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child in violation 12    of subsection (a)(2)(D) shall be sentenced under Section 13    5-4.5-105 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 14        (1.2) A person who has attained the age of 18 years at 15    the time of the commission of the offense and convicted of 16    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child committed 17    against 2 or more persons regardless of whether the 18    offenses occurred as the result of the same act or of 19    several related or unrelated acts shall be sentenced to a 20    term of natural life imprisonment and an offender under 21    the age of 18 years at the time of the commission of the 22    offense shall be sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 of the 23    Unified Code of Corrections.24        (2) A person who has attained the age of 18 years at 25    the time of the commission of the offense and who is 26    convicted of a second or subsequent offense of predatory   SB3892- 12 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    criminal sexual assault of a child, or who is convicted of 2    the offense of predatory criminal sexual assault of a 3    child after having previously been convicted of the 4    offense of criminal sexual assault or the offense of 5    aggravated criminal sexual assault, or who is convicted of 6    the offense of predatory criminal sexual assault of a 7    child after having previously been convicted under the 8    laws of this State or any other state of an offense that is 9    substantially equivalent to the offense of predatory 10    criminal sexual assault of a child, the offense of 11    aggravated criminal sexual assault or the offense of 12    criminal sexual assault, shall be sentenced to a term of 13    natural life imprisonment. The commission of the second or 14    subsequent offense is required to have been after the 15    initial conviction for this paragraph (2) to apply. An 16    offender under the age of 18 years at the time of the 17    commission of the offense covered by this paragraph (2) 18    shall be sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 of the Unified 19    Code of Corrections. 20(Source: P.A. 98-370, eff. 1-1-14; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14; 2198-903, eff. 8-15-14; 99-69, eff. 1-1-16.) 22    (720 ILCS 5/11-1.50)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-15)23    Sec. 11-1.50. Criminal sexual abuse. 24    (a) A person commits criminal sexual abuse if that person: 25        (1) commits an act of sexual conduct by the use of   SB3892- 13 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    force or threat of force; or 2        (2) commits an act of sexual conduct and knows that 3    the victim is unable to understand the nature of the act or 4    is unable to give knowing consent.5    (b) A person commits criminal sexual abuse if that person 6is under 17 years of age and commits an act of sexual 7penetration or sexual conduct with a victim who is at least 9 8years of age but under 17 years of age.9    (c) A person commits criminal sexual abuse if that person 10commits an act of sexual penetration or sexual conduct with a 11victim who is at least 13 years of age but under 17 years of 12age and the person is less than 5 years older than the victim.13    (d) Sentence. Criminal sexual abuse for a violation of 14subsection (b) or (c) of this Section is a Class A misdemeanor. 15A person convicted of criminal sexual abuse under paragraph 16(1) or (2) of subsection (a) may be sentenced to death. If not 17sentenced to death, criminal Criminal sexual abuse for a 18violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of this 19Section is a Class 4 felony. A second or subsequent conviction 20for a violation of subsection (a) of this Section, if not 21sentenced to death, is a Class 2 felony. For purposes of this 22Section it is a second or subsequent conviction if the accused 23has at any time been convicted under this Section or under any 24similar statute of this State or any other state for any 25offense involving sexual abuse or sexual assault that is 26substantially equivalent to or more serious than the sexual   SB3892- 14 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1abuse prohibited under this Section.2(Source: P.A. 96-1551, eff. 7-1-11.) 3    (720 ILCS 5/11-1.60)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-16)4    Sec. 11-1.60. Aggravated criminal sexual abuse. 5    (a) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual abuse if 6that person commits criminal sexual abuse and any of the 7following aggravating circumstances exist (i) during the 8commission of the offense or (ii) for purposes of paragraph 9(7), as part of the same course of conduct as the commission of 10the offense:11        (1) the person displays, threatens to use, or uses a 12    dangerous weapon or any other object fashioned or used in 13    a manner that leads the victim, under the circumstances, 14    reasonably to believe that the object is a dangerous 15    weapon;16        (2) the person causes bodily harm to the victim;17        (3) the victim is 60 years of age or older;18        (4) the victim is a person with a physical disability;19        (5) the person acts in a manner that threatens or 20    endangers the life of the victim or any other person;21        (6) the person commits the criminal sexual abuse 22    during the course of committing or attempting to commit 23    any other felony; or24        (7) the person delivers (by injection, inhalation, 25    ingestion, transfer of possession, or any other means) any   SB3892- 15 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    controlled substance to the victim for other than medical 2    purposes without the victim's consent or by threat or 3    deception.4    (b) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual abuse if 5that person commits an act of sexual conduct with a victim who 6is under 18 years of age and the person is a family member.7    (c) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual abuse if:8        (1) that person is 17 years of age or over and: (i) 9    commits an act of sexual conduct with a victim who is under 10    13 years of age; or (ii) commits an act of sexual conduct 11    with a victim who is at least 13 years of age but under 17 12    years of age and the person uses force or threat of force 13    to commit the act; or14        (2) that person is under 17 years of age and: (i) 15    commits an act of sexual conduct with a victim who is under 16    9 years of age; or (ii) commits an act of sexual conduct 17    with a victim who is at least 9 years of age but under 17 18    years of age and the person uses force or threat of force 19    to commit the act.20    (d) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual abuse if 21that person commits an act of sexual penetration or sexual 22conduct with a victim who is at least 13 years of age but under 2317 years of age and the person is at least 5 years older than 24the victim.25    (e) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual abuse if 26that person commits an act of sexual conduct with a victim who   SB3892- 16 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1is a person with a severe or profound intellectual disability.2    (f) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual abuse if 3that person commits an act of sexual conduct with a victim who 4is but under 18 years of age and the person is 17 years of age 5or over and holds a position of trust, authority, or 6supervision in relation to the victim.7    (g) Sentence. A person convicted of aggravated criminal 8sexual abuse may be sentenced to death. If not sentenced to 9death, a person convicted of aggravated Aggravated criminal 10sexual abuse for a violation of subsection (a), (b), (c), (d) 11or (e) of this Section is a Class 2 felony. If not sentenced to 12death a person convicted of aggravated Aggravated criminal 13sexual abuse for a violation of subsection (f) of this Section 14is a Class 1 felony. 15(Source: P.A. 102-567, eff. 1-1-22.) 16    Section 15. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 17amended by changing Section 119-1 as follows: 18    (725 ILCS 5/119-1)19    Sec. 119-1. Death penalty restored abolished.20    (a) (Blank). Beginning on July 1, 2011 (the effective date 21of Public Act 96-1543), notwithstanding any other law to the 22contrary, the death penalty is abolished and a sentence to 23death may not be imposed. 24    (b) The Death Penalty Restoration Abolition Fund, a   SB3892- 17 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1special fund in the State treasury, shall be expended by the 2Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority for services 3for families of victims of homicide or murder and for training 4of law enforcement personnel. 5(Source: P.A. 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 6    Section 20. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 7changing Sections 5-4.5-20 and 5-8-1 as follows: 8    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-20)9    Sec. 5-4.5-20. FIRST DEGREE MURDER; SENTENCE. For first 10degree murder:11    (a) TERM. The defendant may be sentenced to death. If not 12sentenced to death, the The defendant shall be sentenced to 13imprisonment under Section 9-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 14the Criminal Code of 2012. Imprisonment shall be for a 15determinate term, subject to Section 5-4.5-115 of this Code, 16of (1) not less than 20 years and not more than 60 years; (2) 17not less than 60 years and not more than 100 years when an 18extended term is imposed under Section 5-8-2; or (3) natural 19life as provided in Section 5-8-1. 20    (b) PERIODIC IMPRISONMENT. A term of periodic imprisonment 21shall not be imposed. 22    (c) IMPACT INCARCERATION. The impact incarceration program 23or the county impact incarceration program is not an 24authorized disposition.   SB3892- 18 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    (d) PROBATION; CONDITIONAL DISCHARGE. A period of 2probation or conditional discharge shall not be imposed. 3    (e) FINE. Fines may be imposed as provided in Section 45-4.5-50(b). 5    (f) RESTITUTION. See Section 5-5-6 concerning restitution. 6    (g) CONCURRENT OR CONSECUTIVE SENTENCE. The sentence shall 7be concurrent or consecutive as provided in Section 5-8-4 and 8Section 5-4.5-50. 9    (h) DRUG COURT. Drug court is not an authorized 10disposition. 11    (i) CREDIT FOR HOME DETENTION. See Section 5-4.5-100 12concerning no credit for time spent in home detention prior to 13judgment. 14    (j) SENTENCE CREDIT. See Section 3-6-3 for rules and 15regulations for sentence credit. 16    (k) ELECTRONIC MONITORING AND HOME DETENTION. Electronic 17monitoring and home detention are not authorized dispositions, 18except in limited circumstances as provided in Section 5-8A-3. 19    (l) PAROLE; MANDATORY SUPERVISED RELEASE. Except as 20provided in Section 3-3-8, the parole or mandatory supervised 21release term shall be 3 years upon release from imprisonment. 22(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 23    (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8-1)24    Sec. 5-8-1. Natural life imprisonment; enhancements for 25use of a firearm; mandatory supervised release terms.   SB3892- 19 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    (a) Except as otherwise provided in the statute defining 2the offense or in Article 4.5 of Chapter V, a sentence of 3imprisonment for a felony shall be a determinate sentence set 4by the court under this Section, subject to Section 5-4.5-115 5of this Code, according to the following limitations:6        (1) for first degree murder,7            (a) (blank),8            (a-5) a sentence of death may be imposed. If the 9        sentence of death is not imposed, the person shall be 10        sentenced as provided in this Section or Section 11        5-4.5-20, 12            (b) if a trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable 13        doubt that the murder was accompanied by exceptionally 14        brutal or heinous behavior indicative of wanton 15        cruelty or, except as set forth in subsection 16        (a)(1)(c) of this Section, that any of the aggravating 17        factors listed in subparagraph (b-5) are present, the 18        court may sentence the defendant, subject to Section 19        5-4.5-105, to a term of natural life imprisonment, or20            (b-5) a defendant who at the time of the 21        commission of the offense has attained the age of 18 or 22        more and who has been found guilty of first degree 23        murder may be sentenced to a term of natural life 24        imprisonment if: 25                (1) the murdered individual was an inmate at 26            an institution or facility of the Department of   SB3892- 20 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 2            agency and was killed on the grounds thereof, or 3            the murdered individual was otherwise present in 4            such institution or facility with the knowledge 5            and approval of the chief administrative officer 6            thereof; 7                (2) the murdered individual was killed as a 8            result of the hijacking of an airplane, train, 9            ship, bus, or other public conveyance; 10                (3) the defendant committed the murder 11            pursuant to a contract, agreement, or 12            understanding by which he or she was to receive 13            money or anything of value in return for 14            committing the murder or procured another to 15            commit the murder for money or anything of value; 16                (4) the murdered individual was killed in the 17            course of another felony if: 18                    (A) the murdered individual: 19                        (i) was actually killed by the 20                    defendant, or 21                        (ii) received physical injuries 22                    personally inflicted by the defendant 23                    substantially contemporaneously with 24                    physical injuries caused by one or more 25                    persons for whose conduct the defendant is 26                    legally accountable under Section 5-2 of   SB3892- 21 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1                    this Code, and the physical injuries 2                    inflicted by either the defendant or the 3                    other person or persons for whose conduct 4                    he is legally accountable caused the death 5                    of the murdered individual; and (B) in 6                    performing the acts which caused the death 7                    of the murdered individual or which 8                    resulted in physical injuries personally 9                    inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 10                    individual under the circumstances of 11                    subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this 12                    clause (4), the defendant acted with the 13                    intent to kill the murdered individual or 14                    with the knowledge that his or her acts 15                    created a strong probability of death or 16                    great bodily harm to the murdered 17                    individual or another; and 18                    (B) in performing the acts which caused 19                the death of the murdered individual or which 20                resulted in physical injuries personally 21                inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 22                individual under the circumstances of 23                subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this clause 24                (4), the defendant acted with the intent to 25                kill the murdered individual or with the 26                knowledge that his or her acts created a   SB3892- 22 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1                strong probability of death or great bodily 2                harm to the murdered individual or another; 3                and 4                    (C) the other felony was an inherently 5                violent crime or the attempt to commit an 6                inherently violent crime. In this clause (C), 7                "inherently violent crime" includes, but is 8                not limited to, armed robbery, robbery, 9                predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 10                aggravated criminal sexual assault, aggravated 11                kidnapping, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 12                aggravated arson, aggravated stalking, 13                residential burglary, and home invasion; 14                (5) the defendant committed the murder with 15            intent to prevent the murdered individual from 16            testifying or participating in any criminal 17            investigation or prosecution or giving material 18            assistance to the State in any investigation or 19            prosecution, either against the defendant or 20            another; or the defendant committed the murder 21            because the murdered individual was a witness in 22            any prosecution or gave material assistance to the 23            State in any investigation or prosecution, either 24            against the defendant or another; for purposes of 25            this clause (5), "participating in any criminal 26            investigation or prosecution" is intended to   SB3892- 23 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1            include those appearing in the proceedings in any 2            capacity such as trial judges, prosecutors, 3            defense attorneys, investigators, witnesses, or 4            jurors; 5                (6) the defendant, while committing an offense 6            punishable under Section 401, 401.1, 401.2, 405, 7            405.2, 407, or 407.1 or subsection (b) of Section 8            404 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 9            while engaged in a conspiracy or solicitation to 10            commit such offense, intentionally killed an 11            individual or counseled, commanded, induced, 12            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 13            murdered individual; 14                (7) the defendant was incarcerated in an 15            institution or facility of the Department of 16            Corrections at the time of the murder, and while 17            committing an offense punishable as a felony under 18            Illinois law, or while engaged in a conspiracy or 19            solicitation to commit such offense, intentionally 20            killed an individual or counseled, commanded, 21            induced, procured, or caused the intentional 22            killing of the murdered individual; 23                (8) the murder was committed in a cold, 24            calculated and premeditated manner pursuant to a 25            preconceived plan, scheme, or design to take a 26            human life by unlawful means, and the conduct of   SB3892- 24 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1            the defendant created a reasonable expectation 2            that the death of a human being would result 3            therefrom; 4                (9) the defendant was a principal 5            administrator, organizer, or leader of a 6            calculated criminal drug conspiracy consisting of 7            a hierarchical position of authority superior to 8            that of all other members of the conspiracy, and 9            the defendant counseled, commanded, induced, 10            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 11            murdered person; 12                (10) the murder was intentional and involved 13            the infliction of torture. For the purpose of this 14            clause (10), torture means the infliction of or 15            subjection to extreme physical pain, motivated by 16            an intent to increase or prolong the pain, 17            suffering, or agony of the victim; 18                (11) the murder was committed as a result of 19            the intentional discharge of a firearm by the 20            defendant from a motor vehicle and the victim was 21            not present within the motor vehicle; 22                (12) the murdered individual was a person with 23            a disability and the defendant knew or should have 24            known that the murdered individual was a person 25            with a disability. For purposes of this clause 26            (12), "person with a disability" means a person   SB3892- 25 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1            who suffers from a permanent physical or mental 2            impairment resulting from disease, an injury, a 3            functional disorder, or a congenital condition 4            that renders the person incapable of adequately 5            providing for his or her own health or personal 6            care; 7                (13) the murdered individual was subject to an 8            order of protection and the murder was committed 9            by a person against whom the same order of 10            protection was issued under the Illinois Domestic 11            Violence Act of 1986; 12                (14) the murdered individual was known by the 13            defendant to be a teacher or other person employed 14            in any school and the teacher or other employee is 15            upon the grounds of a school or grounds adjacent 16            to a school, or is in any part of a building used 17            for school purposes; 18                (15) the murder was committed by the defendant 19            in connection with or as a result of the offense of 20            terrorism as defined in Section 29D-14.9 of this 21            Code; 22                (16) the murdered individual was a member of a 23            congregation engaged in prayer or other religious 24            activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or 25            other building, structure, or place used for 26            religious worship; or   SB3892- 26 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1                (17)(i) the murdered individual was a 2            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 3            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse; 4                (ii) the defendant knew or should have known 5            that the murdered individual was a physician, 6            physician assistant, psychologist, nurse, or 7            advanced practice registered nurse; and 8                (iii) the murdered individual was killed in 9            the course of acting in his or her capacity as a 10            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 11            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse, or 12            to prevent him or her from acting in that 13            capacity, or in retaliation for his or her acting 14            in that capacity. 15            (c) the court shall sentence the defendant to a 16        term of natural life imprisonment if the defendant, at 17        the time of the commission of the murder, had attained 18        the age of 18, and: 19                (i) has previously been convicted of first 20            degree murder under any state or federal law, or21                (ii) is found guilty of murdering more than 22            one victim, or23                (iii) is found guilty of murdering a peace 24            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 25            when the peace officer, fireman, or emergency 26            management worker was killed in the course of   SB3892- 27 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1            performing his official duties, or to prevent the 2            peace officer or fireman from performing his 3            official duties, or in retaliation for the peace 4            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 5            from performing his official duties, and the 6            defendant knew or should have known that the 7            murdered individual was a peace officer, fireman, 8            or emergency management worker, or9                (iv) is found guilty of murdering an employee 10            of an institution or facility of the Department of 11            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 12            agency, when the employee was killed in the course 13            of performing his official duties, or to prevent 14            the employee from performing his official duties, 15            or in retaliation for the employee performing his 16            official duties, or17                (v) is found guilty of murdering an emergency 18            medical technician - ambulance, emergency medical 19            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 20            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 21            medical assistance or first aid person while 22            employed by a municipality or other governmental 23            unit when the person was killed in the course of 24            performing official duties or to prevent the 25            person from performing official duties or in 26            retaliation for performing official duties and the   SB3892- 28 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1            defendant knew or should have known that the 2            murdered individual was an emergency medical 3            technician - ambulance, emergency medical 4            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 5            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 6            medical assistant or first aid personnel, or7                (vi) (blank), or8                (vii) is found guilty of first degree murder 9            and the murder was committed by reason of any 10            person's activity as a community policing 11            volunteer or to prevent any person from engaging 12            in activity as a community policing volunteer. For 13            the purpose of this Section, "community policing 14            volunteer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 15            Section 2-3.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012.16            For purposes of clause (v), "emergency medical 17        technician - ambulance", "emergency medical technician -18         intermediate", and "emergency medical technician - 19        paramedic"have the meanings ascribed to them in the 20        Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act.21            (d)(i) if the person committed the offense while 22            armed with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to 23            the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;24            (ii) if, during the commission of the offense, the 25        person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall 26        be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the   SB3892- 29 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1        court;2            (iii) if, during the commission of the offense, 3        the person personally discharged a firearm that 4        proximately caused great bodily harm, permanent 5        disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to 6        another person, 25 years or up to a term of natural 7        life shall be added to the term of imprisonment 8        imposed by the court.9        (2) (blank);10        (2.5) for a person who has attained the age of 18 years 11    at the time of the commission of the offense and who is 12    convicted under the circumstances described in subdivision 13    (b)(1)(B) of Section 11-1.20 or paragraph (3) of 14    subsection (b) of Section 12-13, subdivision (d)(2) of 15    Section 11-1.30 or paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 16    Section 12-14, subdivision (b)(1.2) of Section 11-1.40 or 17    paragraph (1.2) of subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1, 18    subdivision (b)(2) of Section 11-1.40 or paragraph (2) of 19    subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1 of the Criminal Code of 20    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, the sentence shall be a 21    term of natural life imprisonment.22    (b) (Blank).23    (c) (Blank).24    (d) Subject to earlier termination under Section 3-3-8, 25the parole or mandatory supervised release term shall be 26written as part of the sentencing order and shall be as   SB3892- 30 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1follows:2        (1) for first degree murder or for the offenses of 3    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 4    criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual assault if 5    committed on or before December 12, 2005, 3 years;6        (1.5) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 7    subsection (d), for a Class X felony except for the 8    offenses of predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 9    aggravated criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual 10    assault if committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the 11    effective date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the 12    offense of aggravated child pornography under Section 13    11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 with sentencing under 14    subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code 15    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if committed on or 16    after January 1, 2009, and except for the offense of 17    obscene depiction of a purported child with sentencing 18    under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal 19    Code of 2012, 18 months; 20        (2) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 21    subsection (d), for a Class 1 felony or a Class 2 felony 22    except for the offense of criminal sexual assault if 23    committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the effective 24    date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the offenses of 25    manufacture and dissemination of child sexual abuse 26    material under clauses (a)(1) and (a)(2) of Section   SB3892- 31 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 2    of 2012, if committed on or after January 1, 2009, and 3    except for the offense of obscene depiction of a purported 4    child under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 5    11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 12 months;6        (3) except as provided in paragraph (4), (6), or (7) 7    of this subsection (d), for a Class 3 felony or a Class 4 8    felony, 6 months; no later than 45 days after the onset of 9    the term of mandatory supervised release, the Prisoner 10    Review Board shall conduct a discretionary discharge 11    review pursuant to the provisions of Section 3-3-8, which 12    shall include the results of a standardized risk and needs 13    assessment tool administered by the Department of 14    Corrections; the changes to this paragraph (3) made by 15    Public Act 102-1104 apply to all individuals released on 16    mandatory supervised release on or after December 6, 2022 17    (the effective date of Public Act 102-1104), including 18    those individuals whose sentences were imposed prior to 19    December 6, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 20    102-1104);21        (4) for defendants who commit the offense of predatory 22    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 23    sexual assault, or criminal sexual assault, on or after 24    December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 25    94-715), or who commit the offense of aggravated child 26    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1   SB3892- 32 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 2    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 3    manufacture of child sexual abuse material, or 4    dissemination of child sexual abuse material after January 5    1, 2009, or who commit the offense of obscene depiction of 6    a purported child under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of 7    Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or who commit 8    the offense of obscene depiction of a purported child with 9    sentencing under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the 10    Criminal Code of 2012, the term of mandatory supervised 11    release shall range from a minimum of 3 years to a maximum 12    of the natural life of the defendant;13        (5) if the victim is under 18 years of age, for a 14    second or subsequent offense of aggravated criminal sexual 15    abuse or felony criminal sexual abuse, 4 years, at least 16    the first 2 years of which the defendant shall serve in an 17    electronic monitoring or home detention program under 18    Article 8A of Chapter V of this Code;19        (6) for a felony domestic battery, aggravated domestic 20    battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, and a felony 21    violation of an order of protection, 4 years; 22        (7) for any felony described in paragraph (a)(2)(ii), 23    (a)(2)(iii), (a)(2)(iv), (a)(2)(vi), (a)(2.1), (a)(2.3), 24    (a)(2.4), (a)(2.5), or (a)(2.6) of Article 5, Section 25    3-6-3 of the Unified Code of Corrections requiring an 26    inmate to serve a minimum of 85% of their court-imposed   SB3892- 33 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1    sentence, except for the offenses of predatory criminal 2    sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal sexual 3    assault, and criminal sexual assault if committed on or 4    after December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 5    94-715) and except for the offense of aggravated child 6    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 7    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 8    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 9    if committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for 10    the offense of obscene depiction of a purported child with 11    sentencing under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the 12    Criminal Code of 2012, and except as provided in paragraph 13    (4) or paragraph (6) of this subsection (d), the term of 14    mandatory supervised release shall be as follows:15            (A) Class X felony, 3 years;16            (B) Class 1 or Class 2 felonies, 2 years;17            (C) Class 3 or Class 4 felonies, 1 year. 18    (e) (Blank).19    (f) (Blank).20    (g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act and 21of Public Act 101-652: (i) the provisions of paragraph (3) of 22subsection (d) are effective on July 1, 2022 and shall apply to 23all individuals convicted on or after the effective date of 24paragraph (3) of subsection (d); and (ii) the provisions of 25paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of subsection (d) are effective on 26July 1, 2021 and shall apply to all individuals convicted on or   SB3892- 34 -LRB104 17925 RLC 31362 b1after the effective date of paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of 2subsection (d).3(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; 4104-245, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)